test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_ruavast_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - ruávást: # 1B d-k,  v-ˊv
    ruávást+N+Sg+Nom: ruávást
    ruávást+N+Sg+Gen: ruávást
    ruávást+N+Sg+Acc: ruávást
    ruávást+N+Sg+Ill: ruáˊvástân
    ruávást+N+Sg+Loc: ruáˊvástist
    ruávást+N+Sg+Com: ruáˊvástáin
    ruávást+N+Sg+Abe: ruáˊvásttáá
    ruávást+N+Ess: ruáˊvástin
    ruávást+N+Par: ruáˊvástid
    ruávást+N+Pl+Nom: ruáˊvásteh
    ruávást+N+Pl+Gen: ruáˊvástij
    ruávást+N+Pl+Acc: ruáˊvástijd
    ruávást+N+Pl+Ill: ruáˊvástáid
    ruávást+N+Pl+Loc: ruáˊvástijn
    ruávást+N+Pl+Com: ruáˊvástijguin
    ruávást+N+Pl+Abe: ruáˊvástijttáá

  Noun - siilak: # 1B d-k,  v-ˊv
    siilak+N+Sg+Nom: siilak
    siilak+N+Sg+Gen: siilak
    siilak+N+Sg+Acc: siilak
    siilak+N+Sg+Ill: silakân
    siilak+N+Sg+Loc: silakist
    siilak+N+Sg+Com: silakáin
    siilak+N+Sg+Abe: siilakttáá
    siilak+N+Ess: silakin
    siilak+N+Par: silakid
    siilak+N+Pl+Nom: silakeh
    siilak+N+Pl+Gen: silakij
    siilak+N+Pl+Acc: silakijd
    siilak+N+Pl+Ill: silakáid
    siilak+N+Pl+Loc: silakijn
    siilak+N+Pl+Com: silakijguin
    siilak+N+Pl+Abe: silakijttáá

  Noun - iilâsk: # 1B d-k,  v-ˊv
    iilâsk+N+Sg+Nom: iilâsk
    iilâsk+N+Sg+Gen: iilâsk
    iilâsk+N+Sg+Acc: iilâsk
    iilâsk+N+Sg+Ill: ilâskân
    iilâsk+N+Sg+Loc: ilâskist
    iilâsk+N+Sg+Com: ilâskáin
    iilâsk+N+Sg+Abe: iilâskttáá
    iilâsk+N+Ess: ilâskin
    iilâsk+N+Par: ilâskid
    iilâsk+N+Pl+Nom: ilâskeh
    iilâsk+N+Pl+Gen: ilâskij
    iilâsk+N+Pl+Acc: ilâskijd
    iilâsk+N+Pl+Ill: ilâskáid
    iilâsk+N+Pl+Loc: ilâskijn
    iilâsk+N+Pl+Com: ilâskijguin
    iilâsk+N+Pl+Abe: ilâskijttáá

  Noun - saalaat: # 1B d-k,  v-ˊv
    saalaat+N+Sg+Nom: saalaat
    saalaat+N+Sg+Gen: saalaat
    saalaat+N+Sg+Acc: saalaat
    saalaat+N+Sg+Ill: salatân, saalaatân
    saalaat+N+Sg+Loc: salatist, saalaatist
    saalaat+N+Sg+Com: salattáin, saalaatáin
    saalaat+N+Sg+Abe: saalaattáá
    saalaat+N+Ess: saalaattin
    saalaat+N+Par: saalaattid
    saalaat+N+Pl+Nom: salateh, saalaateh
    saalaat+N+Pl+Gen: [salatij, saalaatij]
    saalaat+N+Pl+Acc: [salatijd, saalaatijd]
    saalaat+N+Pl+Ill: [salatáid, saalaatáid]
    saalaat+N+Pl+Loc: saalaatijn
    saalaat+N+Pl+Com: saalaatijguin
    saalaat+N+Pl+Abe: saalaatijttáá
